Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Audits and Oversight
Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15744 TJ 01/05/26





Req. No. 15744 Page 1